Nebraska, session 109, LB670.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB670 LB670
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 43-2606, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2606 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations for mandatory training requirements
for providers of child care and school-age-care programs. Such
requirements shall include preservice orientation and annual inservice
training of no more than and at least four hours of annual inservice
training. All child care programs required to be licensed under section
71-1911 shall show completion of a preservice orientation approved or
delivered by the department prior to receiving a provisional license.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2020, for programs that report to the
Nebraska Early Childhood Professional Record System created under section
71-1962, the department shall use the Nebraska Early Childhood
Professional Record System to (a) document the training levels of staff
in specific child care settings to assist parents in selecting optimal
care settings and (b) verify minimum training requirements of employees
of such programs.
(3) The training requirements shall be designed to meet the health,
safety, and developmental needs of children and shall be tailored to the
needs of licensed providers of child care programs. Preservice
orientation and the inservice training requirements for providers of
child care programs shall include, but not be limited to, information on
sudden unexpected infant death syndrome, abusive head trauma in infants
and children, crying plans, and child abuse.
(4) The department shall provide or arrange for training
opportunities throughout the state and shall provide information
regarding training opportunities to all providers of child care programs
at the time of registration or licensure, when renewing a registration,
or on a yearly basis following licensure.
(5) Each provider of child care and school-age-care programs
receiving inservice orientation or training shall provide his or her
-2-

LB670 LB670
2025 2025
social security number to the department.
(6) The department shall review and provide recommendations to the
Governor for updating rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under
this section at least every five years.
Sec. 2. (1) Each school board of a school district and each
governing board of a nonpublic school shall adopt and maintain a safety
plan and may use the model safety plan developed by the state school
security director as a guide. Such plan shall be updated annually and
shall at a minimum include:
(a) Fire drills and instruction on fire dangers and methods of fire
prevention;
(b) Tornado or other weather-related preparedness drills and
instruction;
(c) Vehicle safety and emergency evacuation drills and instruction;
and
(d) Any other safety and emergency drills or instruction deemed
appropriate by the school board or governing board.
(2) Each school district shall provide the school district's safety
plan to the school security director every three years.
(3) The state school security director may provide suggestions and
offer training or other resources relating to safety plans to any school.
Sec. 3. Section 79-2,144, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2,144 The state school security director appointed pursuant to
section 79-2,143 shall be responsible for providing leadership and
support for safety and security for the public and nonpublic schools.
Duties of the director include, but are not limited to:
(1) Collecting safety and security plans , required pursuant to
rules and regulations of the State Department of Education relating to
accreditation of schools, and other school security information from each
school system in Nebraska. School districts shall provide the state
-3-

LB670 LB670
2025 2025
school security director with the safety and security plans of the school
district and any other security information reasonably requested by the
director, but any plans or information submitted by a school district may
be withheld by the department pursuant to subdivision (9) of section
84-712.05;
(2) Recommending minimum standards for school security on or before
January 1, 2016, to the State Board of Education;
(3) Periodically conducting Conducting an assessment of the security
of each public school building of an approved or accredited public or
nonpublic school , which assessment shall be completed by August 31,
2019;
(4) Identifying deficiencies in school security based on the minimum
standards adopted by the State Board of Education and making
recommendations to school boards for remedying such deficiencies;
(5) Establishing security awareness and preparedness tools and
training programs for public school staff;
(6) Establishing research-based model instructional programs for
staff, students, and parents to address the underlying causes for violent
attacks on schools;
(7) Overseeing behavioral and mental health training, with a focus
on suicide awareness and prevention in public schools pursuant to section
79-2,146;
(8) Establishing a model safety plan for use by school districts and
nonpublic schools pursuant to section 2 of this act tornado preparedness
standards which shall include, but not be limited to, ensuring that every
school conducts at least two tornado drills per year;
(9) Responding to inquiries and requests for assistance relating to
school security from public and nonpublic private, denominational, and
parochial schools;
(10) Recommending curricular and extracurricular materials to assist
school districts in preventing and responding to cyberbullying and
-4-

LB670 LB670
2025 2025
digital citizenship issues; and
(11) Carrying out the department's responsibilities under the School
Safety and Security Reporting System Act.
Sec. 4. Section 79-308, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-308 (1) The Commissioner of Education shall organize institutes
and conferences at such times and places as he or she deems practicable.
He or she shall, as far as practicable, attend such institutes and
conferences, provide proper instructors for the same, and in other ways
seek to improve the efficiency of teachers and advance the cause of
education in the state.
(2) The Legislature finds that (a) an educator-effectiveness system
includes a quality evaluation system with the primary goal of improving
instruction and learning in every school district and (b) school
districts have an opportunity to receive training on the quality
evaluation models.
(3) Beginning with the 2016-17 school year through the 2020-21
school year, school districts may apply to the State Department of
Education for grant funding for a period of up to two years to implement
an evaluation model for effective educators and to obtain the necessary
training for administrators and teachers for such model.
(3)(a) The State Board of Education shall not adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations that require more than four hours of annual
inservice training for (i) teachers, (ii) paraeducators, or (iii) home
visitors who have regular contact with children in prekindergarten
programs.
(b) A school board may elect to require additional training for the
employees of such school district.
Sec. 5. Section 79-609, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-609 (1) The school board or board of education, after
-5-

LB670 LB670
2025 2025
consultation with a member of the Nebraska State Patrol, shall determine
the number of passengers that may be safely transported in each bus.
(2)(a) Any company or agency that provides transportation of pupils
by school bus and contracts directly with the pupils or their parents,
(b) the school board or board of education of the public schools, and (c)
the governing authority of any nonpublic private, denominational, or
parochial school in this state shall provide , at least twice during each
school year to each pupil who is transported in a school bus, instruction
in safe riding practice and participation in emergency evacuation drills
outlined in the school's safety plan required pursuant to section 2 of
this act.
(3) The operator of a school bus equipped with an occupant
protection system as defined in section 60-6,265 shall wear such system
whenever the vehicle is in motion.
Sec. 6. Section 79-706, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-706 Every In addition to any required monthly fire drill, every
public and nonpublic , private, denominational, or parochial school shall
provide regular periods of instruction in the subject of fire dangers and
in methods of fire prevention as prescribed in the school's safety plan
required pursuant to section 2 of this act.
Sec. 7. Section 79-2704, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2704 Each memorandum of understanding required by section 79-2703
shall govern the use of school resource officers or security guards and
shall include, but not be limited to, policies that:
(1) Require each school resource officer or security guard to attend
initial evidence-based a minimum of twenty hours of training, of no more
than twelve hours, focused on school-based law enforcement, including,
but not limited to, coursework focused on school law, student rights,
understanding special needs students and students with disabilities,
-6-

LB670 LB670
2025 2025
conflict de-escalation techniques, ethics for school resource officers,
teenage brain development, adolescent behavior, implicit bias training,
diversity and cultural awareness, trauma-informed responses, and
preventing violence in school settings;
(2) Require a minimum of one administrator in each elementary or
secondary school where a school resource officer or security guard is
assigned to attend initial evidence-based a minimum of twenty hours of
training, of no more than twelve hours, focused on school-based law
enforcement, including, but not limited to, coursework focused on school
law, student rights, understanding special needs students and students
with disabilities, conflict de-escalation techniques, ethics for school
resource officers and security guards, teenage brain development,
adolescent behavior, implicit bias training, diversity and cultural
awareness, trauma-informed responses, and preventing violence in school
settings;
(3) Ensure records are kept on each student referral for prosecution
from a school resource officer in response to an incident occurring at
school, on school grounds, or at a school-sponsored event and ensure that
such records allow for analysis of related data and delineate:
(a) The reason for such referral; and
(b) Federally identified demographic characteristics of such
student;
(4) Identify school policies that address when a parent or guardian
will be notified or present, in a language that such parent or guardian
understands, if a student is subjected to questioning or interrogation by
a school official or by a school resource officer or security guard
operating in conjunction with a school official;
(5) Identify the school or law enforcement agency policies that
address under what circumstances a student will be advised of
constitutional rights prior to being questioned or interrogated by a
school official or by a school resource officer or security guard
-7-

LB670 LB670
2025 2025
operating in conjunction with a school official;
(6) Identify the school policy required by section 79-262 that
addresses the type or category of student conduct or actions that will be
referred to law enforcement for prosecution and the type of student
conduct or actions that will be resolved as a disciplinary matter by a
school official and not subject to referral to law enforcement; and
(7) Identify a student and parent complaint process to express a
concern or file a complaint about a school resource officer or security
guard and the practices of such school resource officer or security guard
with the law enforcement agency or security agency.
Sec. 8. Section 81-527, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-527 It shall be the duty of the State Fire Marshal and his or her
deputies and assistants to make recommendations to all require teachers
of public and nonpublic private schools regarding and educational
institutions to conduct regular fire drills, including best practices and
minimum safety standards in accordance with such rules and regulations as
he or she may adopt and promulgate and to keep all doors and exits
unlocked during school hours.
Sec. 9. Original sections 79-2,144, 79-308, 79-609, 79-706,
79-2704, and 81-527, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section
43-2606, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-8-